Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.030

Division administrative officer—Duties.

The superintendent of public instruction shall employ an administrative officer of the division. The administrative officer, under the direction of the superintendent of public instruction, shall coordinate and supervise the program of special education for eligible children with disabilities in the school districts of the state. He or she shall ensure that school districts provide an appropriate educational opportunity for all children with disabilities in need of special education and related services and shall coordinate with the state secretary of social and health services and with county and regional officers on cases where related services are available for children with disabilities.

[ 2007 c 115 s 3; 1995 c 77 s 9; 1990 c 33 s 122; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 52; 1972 ex.s. c 10 s 1. Prior: 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 3; 1971 c 48 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.13.020; prior: 1943 c 120 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4679-27. Formerly RCW 28A.13.020, 28.13.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: See notes following RCW 28A.155.010.